California, session 20252026, SB636.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 779.8 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:779.8. (a) An electrical or gas corporation shall not disconnect service of a customer for six three months, subject to the provisions of this section, if the customer meets all of the following requirements:(1) The customer is enrolled in the California Alternative Rates for Energy program or the Family Electric Rate Assistance program at the time of the hardship request.(2) The customer makes a hardship request pursuant to applicable rules adopted by the commission.(3) The customer’s hardship request is due to a hardship that is any of the of the following:(A) A death in the family or of someone living within the same residence.(B) The loss of full-time employment within 60 days of the hardship request.(C) Medical care of the customer, a family member, or someone living within the same residence.(D) The customer’s residence, employment, or education is impacted by a wildfire or other natural disaster declared by the Governor to be an emergency pursuant to Section 8558 of the Government Code.(b) An electrical or gas corporation shall grant to a customer who meets the requirements of subdivision (a), a six-month three-month deferment of any and all payments due from the date of the deferment until the end of the six-month three-month period.(c) At the conclusion of the six-month three-month deferment period, the eligible customers shall enroll in the arrearage management program of the electrical or gas corporation for any and all debts on the customer’s account. If the customers are not eligible for the arrearage management program, they will be enrolled in an available payment plan for which they are eligible.(d) During the six-month three-month deferment period, the customer shall not be charged any interest or additional fees for requesting the deferment.(e)An electrical or gas corporation shall not request any supportive documents pertaining to the basis of the hardship request. A customer shall be permitted to self-attest.(f)(e) This section is in addition to other relief or debt forgiveness that may be applicable.(f) A customer who participates in the payment deferral shall not be eligible for a subsequent three-month payment deferral within 18 months of their participation in the payment deferral.(g) The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.